California, session 20252026, AB1931.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 12740 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:12740.(a)The definitions used in this section govern the construction and terms used in this part but shall not affect any other provisions of this code:(1)“Home protection contract” means a contract or agreement whereby a person, other than a builder, seller, or lessor of the home which is the subject of the contract, undertakes for a specified period of time, for a predetermined fee, to repair or replace all or any part of any component, system or appliance of a home necessitated by wear and tear, deterioration or inherent defect, arising during the effective period of the contract, and, in the event of an inspection conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12761, by the failure of that inspection to detect the likelihood of any such loss.Such contract shall provide for a system of service for effectuating such repair or replacement and shall not include protection against consequential damage from the failure of any component, system or appliance.(2)“Home protection company” means any person licensed pursuant to this part which issues home protection contracts.(3)“Protection contract fee” means the consideration received, or to be received, by a home protection company for the issuance of any home protection contract.A home protection contract fee shall be the fee established by a home protection company for coverage extending one year from the effective date of the contract. Where initial coverage is provided for a period in excess of one year, the home protection contract fee shall be the annual fee, plus a separately stated pro rata portion of the annual fee for the period of coverage which exceeds one year.(4)“Home” or “residential property” as used in this part means any single or multiple unit or units, including mobilehomes, as defined in Section 18211 of the Health and Safety Code, used primarily for residential purposes.(b)This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.SEC. 2.Section 12740 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:12740.(a)The definitions used in this section govern the construction and terms used in this part, but shall not affect any other provisions of this code:(1)“Home protection contract” means a contract or agreement whereby a person, other than a builder, seller, or lessor of the home that is the subject of the contract, undertakes for a specified period of time, for a predetermined fee, to repair or replace all or any part of any component, system, or appliance of a home necessitated by wear and tear, deterioration, or inherent defect, arising during the effective period of the contract, and, in the event of an inspection conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12761, by the failure of that inspection to detect the likelihood of any such loss.The contract shall provide for a system of service for effectuating repair or replacement and shall not include protection against consequential damage from the failure of any component, system, or appliance.(2)“Home protection company” means a person licensed pursuant to this part that issues home protection contracts.(3)“Protection contract fee” means the consideration received, or to be received, by a home protection company for the issuance of any home protection contract.A home protection contract fee shall be the fee established by a home protection company for coverage extending one year from the effective date of the contract. When initial coverage is provided for a period in excess of one year, the home protection contract fee shall be the annual fee, plus a separately stated pro rata portion of the annual fee for the period of coverage that exceeds one year.(4)“Home” or “residential property” as used in this part means a single or multiple unit or units, including mobilehomes, as defined in Section 18211 of the Health and Safety Code, used primarily for residential purposes.(5)“Home protection contract limited lines agent” means an organization, other than a home protection company, licensed as a home protection contract limited lines agent pursuant to this part and authorized to transact home protection contracts on behalf of a home protection company.(6)“Utility services” means the provision of electricity, gas, water, sewer services, or services regulated by the Public Utilities Commission.(7)“Utility” means any of the following, or its affiliate, offering utility services to homes or residential properties located in the state:(A)A private business organization.(B)A municipal owned or operated entity.(C)A cooperative.(8)“Home protection contract vendor” means a utility, as defined in this section registered pursuant to Section 12766, as well as its employees, complying with the requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 12766) of Part 7 of Division 2.(b)This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.SEC. 3.Section 12762 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:12762.(a)A home protection contract shall specify, in clear and conspicuous terms, the following information:(1)Each of the appliances, systems, and components covered by the contract.(2)All exclusions and limitations respecting the extent of coverage.(3)The period during which the contract will remain in effect, the protection contract fee, and the renewal terms, if any.(4)With respect to the performance of services by the home protection company, all of the following:(A)The services to be performed by the company and the terms and conditions of such performance.(B)The service fee or fees, if any, to be charged for such services.(C)All limitations respecting the performance of services, including any restrictions as to the time period when or geographical area within which services may be requested or will be performed.(D)A statement that services will be performed upon telephonic request therefor to the company, without any requirement that claim forms or applications be filed prior to the rendition of service.(E)A representation that services will be initiated by or under the direction of the company within 48 hours after a request is made for such services by any person entitled to make such request under the contract, or the agent of such person.(b)The commissioner may adopt, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, such reasonable regulations as may be necessary to make more specific the provisions of this section. Those regulations may also establish such other contract form standards and requirements as the commissioner may deem necessary and appropriate in the public interest. However, this section does not authorize the commissioner to specify those appliances, systems, or components which must be covered by a home protection contract except to the extent necessary to guarantee the equity of the exclusions from coverage offered or provided under a contract, or to the extent necessary to avoid illusory coverage due to the nature or extent of exclusions from the contract.(c)This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and,as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.SEC. 4.Section 12762 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:12762.(a)A home protection contract shall specify, in clear and conspicuous terms, the following information:(1)Each of the appliances, systems, and components covered by the contract.(2)All exclusions and limitations respecting the extent of coverage.(3)The period during which the contract will remain in effect, the protection contract fee, and the renewal terms, if any.(4)With respect to the performance of services by the home protection company, all of the following:(A)The services to be performed by the company and the terms and conditions of such performance.(B)The service fee or fees, if any, to be charged for such services.(C)All limitations respecting the performance of services, including any restrictions as to the time period when or geographical area within which services may be requested or will be performed.(D)A statement that services will be performed upon telephonic request therefor to the company, without any requirement that claim forms or applications be filed prior to the rendition of service.(E)A representation that services will be initiated by or under the direction of the company within 48 hours after a request is made for such services by any person entitled to make such request under the contract, or the agent of such person.(b)A home protection contract transacted by a home protection contract limited lines agent or home protection contract vendor shall include all of the following:(1)A prominent and readily noticeable statement listing the procedure for making a claim, including a toll-free telephone number for claim service.(2)A disclosure in substantially the following form:“Performance to you under this contract is guaranteed by a California approved insurance company. You may file a claim with this insurance company if any obligation in the contract has not been honored within 60 days after your request. The name and address of the insurance company is: (insert name, address, and contact information). If you are not satisfied with the insurance company’s response, you may contact the California Department of Insurance at 1-800-927-4357 or access the department’s internet website (www.insurance.ca.gov).”(3)A provision permitting the purchaser to return a home protection contract within 30 days of purchase if no claims have been made. If returned within the 30-day window, the home protection contract shall be deemed void and the full purchase price of the home protection contract shall be refunded to the purchaser.(c)The commissioner may adopt, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, such reasonable regulations as may be necessary to make more specific the provisions of this section. Those regulations may also establish such other contract form standards and requirements as the commissioner may deem necessary and appropriate in the public interest. However, this section does not authorize the commissioner to specify those appliances, systems, or components which must be covered by a home protection contract except to the extent necessary to guarantee the equity of the exclusions from coverage offered or provided under a contract, or to the extent necessary to avoid illusory coverage due to the nature or extent of exclusions from the contract.(d)This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.SEC. 5.SECTION 1. Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12766) is added to Part 7 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, to read: CHAPTER 4. Home Protection Contract Limited Lines Agent12766.A person may transact, as defined in Section 35, home protection contracts through, or in connection with, a utility, as an agent of the home protection company if they are either of the following:(a)Licensed by the commissioner as a property and casualty insurance agent complying with Section 12771.(b)Licensed as, or operating on behalf of, a home protection contract limited lines agent. 12766. (a) A utility may solicit home protection contracts and collect home protection contract fees if it is a home protection contract vendor acting on behalf of, or in connection with, either of the following:(1) A home protection contract limited lines agent. (2) A property and casualty insurance agent that has been appointed by a home protection company pursuant to Section 12772. (b) A utility shall not enroll customers in a home protection contract. The utility shall direct customers to a home protection company, home protection contract limited lines agent, or property and casualty insurance agent for enrollment. (c) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(1) “Home protection contract limited lines agent” means an entity licensed pursuant to this chapter, authorized to transact home protection contracts on behalf of a home protection company and in connection with a home protection contract vendor. (2) “Home protection contract vendor” means a utility complying with the requirements of this chapter and either of the following: (A) Registered pursuant to Section 12768. (B) Acting in connection with a property and casualty insurance agent.(3) “Utility” means an entity, or an affiliate of an entity, regulated by the Public Utilities Commission. 12767. (a) An applicant for a home protection contract limited lines agent license under this section shall submit all of the following to the commissioner:(1) An electronic or written application for licensure, signed by an officer of the applicant, in the a form prescribed by the commissioner.(2) A certificate issued by the home protection company that is to be named in the home protection contract limited lines agent license, stating that the home protection company has satisfied itself that the named applicant is trustworthy and competent to act as its home protection contract limited lines agent and that the home protection company will appoint the applicant to act as its agent if the home protection contract limited lines agent license is issued by the commissioner. The certification shall be signed by an officer or managing agent of the home protection company on a form prescribed by the commissioner.(3)All training materials described in subdivision (f) of Section 12768.(4)(3) An application fee, and, fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and, for each license period thereafter, a renewal fee of five hundred thousand dollars ($500). ($5,000).(b) Costs associated with an enforcement action shall be assessed against the person or organization licensed pursuant to this chapter. 12768. A home protection contract limited lines agent may authorize a home protection contract vendor, or its employee, to transact vendor to solicit home protection contracts on behalf of, and under, and collect home protection contract fees on its behalf and under its authority, under the following conditions:(a)The home protection contract limited lines agent is clearly and conspicuously identified on home protection contract marketing materials distributed by the home protection contract vendor to customers, which shall include the agent’s name, business address, email address or other comparable electronic communication method, telephone number, and license number.(a) The home protection contract limited lines agent certifies that the home protection contract vendor has not been convicted of violating Section 1033 of Title 18 of the United States Code.(b) Home protection contract marketing materials distributed by the home protection contract vendor include the disclosures listed in subdivision (b) of Section 12769.(b)(c) (1) The home protection contract limited lines agent, during the time of licensure, agent maintains a register in a form prescribed by, or acceptable to, the commissioner, shall maintain a register commissioner listing the utility or utilities home protection contract vendors permitted to transact solicit home protection contracts on its behalf as a home protection contract vendor. and collect home protection contract fees on its behalf. The register shall include the name and contact information of the home protection contract vendor and an officer or person who directs or controls the home protection contract vendor’s home protection contract related operations, and the utility’s Public Utilities Commission identification number or numbers, if any. The home protection contract limited lines agent shall submit the register for review and inspection to the commissioner in a form prescribed by, or acceptable to, the commissioner upon request. both of the following:(A) The name and contact information for both of the following:(i) The home protection contract vendor.(ii) An officer or person who directs or controls the home protection contract vendor’s home protection contract-related operations.(B) The identification number provided by the Public Utilities Commission to the utility, or the affiliate, when the affiliate holds the identification number.(d) The home protection contract limited lines agent submits the register to the commissioner annually or upon request.(c)(e) The home protection contract limited lines agent shall designate one of its employees designates an individual licensee in the state to transact property and casualty insurance to be responsible for its compliance with insurance home protection contract laws, rules, and regulations of the state.(d)(f) The employee individual designated under subdivision (c) (e) and any of the organization’s partners, members, controlling persons, officers, directors, and managers complies with the background check requirements as required by the commissioner.(e)The home protection contract limited lines agent has paid all applicable licensing fees required under California law.(f)The home protection contract limited lines agent uses all reasonable means at its disposal to ensure compliance with all obligations under this chapter by the home protection contract vendor and its employees, including requiring every employee of the home protection contract vendor whose duties include transacting home protection contracts to receive training.(1)The training shall be provided whenever there is a material change that requires a modification to the home protection contract limited lines agent’s training materials, but no less frequently than every year.(2)Training materials used by, or on behalf of, the home protection contract limited lines agent to train the employees of a home protection contract vendor shall be submitted to the department at the time the home protection contract limited lines agent applies for a license under this chapter, and whenever modified thereafter.(3)At a minimum, the training materials shall contain instruction on the types of utility home protection contracts offered, ethical sales practices, and disclosures to prospective customers. Any changes to previously submitted training materials shall be submitted to the department, with the changes highlighted, at least 30 days prior to their use by the home protection contract limited lines agent. Training materials and changes to those materials submitted to the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed approved for use by the home protection contract limited lines agent unless it is notified by the department to the contrary.(4)Failure by a home protection contract limited lines agent to submit training materials or changes for departmental review or use of unapproved or disapproved training materials shall constitute grounds for denial of an application for a license, nonrenewal of a license, or suspension of a license, or other action as deemed appropriate by the commissioner.(g) The home protection contract limited lines agent has paid the applicable licensing fees required by Section 12767.(h) The conduct of the home protection contract vendor, while acting within the scope of its authority, is deemed the conduct of the home protection contract limited lines agent.12768.5.12769. (a) (1)The home protection contract vendor or its employees shall only distribute marketing materials that are include the disclosures outlined in subdivision (b) and comply with Section 1725.5. The marketing materials shall be provided or approved by a home protection contract limited lines agent and the home protection company. (2)(b) All marketing materials distributed by the home protection contract vendor or its employees shall include the a clear and conspicuous disclosure of all of the following:(1) The home protection contract limited lines agent’s name, business address, email address or other comparable electronic communication method, telephone number, and license number. (3)If the marketing materials subject to paragraph (2) include an enrollment application form, the marketing materials shall list the procedure for making a claim under the home protection contract.(b)In addition to the requirements outlined in Section 12768, the home protection contract vendor and its employees shall do all of the following:(1)Act in good faith and in a fair, honest, and ethical manner when offering a home protection contract.(2)Not make false, misleading, or deceptive statements regarding a home protection contract being offered.(3)Not sell a home protection contract that the home protection contract vendor, or its employee, knows, or reasonably should know, is unnecessary for the consumer.(2) The purchase of a home protection contract is optional and not required in order to purchase or pay for any other product or service offered by the utility.(c) Marketing or advertisements for home protection contracts shall not appear directly on the utility bill.(d) An unlicensed employee of the home protection contract vendor shall not engage in any activity relating to the transaction of home protection contracts other than clerical services, billing services, or indirect marketing support.12769.12770. (a) A home protection contract vendor may collect home protection fees contract fees through the utility bill on behalf of a home protection contract limited lines agent or a property and casualty insurance agent if the invoice or utility bill does both all of the following:(1) Includes a clear statement that the home protection contract is issued by a third party and not the utility.(1)(2) Lists the home protection contract fees separately from any utility charges or fees. fees, with clear identification that the fees are charged by the home protection contract limited lines agent or property and casualty insurance agent.(2)(3) Includes a telephone number number, and if space allows, a digital contact for customers to contact the home protection contract limited lines agent or property and casualty insurance agent to inquire about their home protection contract.(b) A home protection contract vendor that collects fees through a utility bill shall ensure that customer payments are applied first to charges due for utility services prior to applying payments for home protection contracts.(b)(c) A home protection contract vendor shall not be required to maintain home protection contract fees in a segregated account if the home protection company has provided in writing that the funds need not be segregated from funds received by a home protection contract vendor for utility services. All home protection contract fees received by a home protection contract vendor from a customer shall be considered funds held in trust by the home protection contract vendor in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of the home protection company.(c)A home protection contract vendor or its employee shall provide a clear and conspicuous disclosure stating that “Purchasing a home protection contract is not required in order to purchase or pay for any other product or service offered by the utility” to the contract purchaser in one of the following ways:(1)If the contract purchaser is transacting the home protection contract through the mail, in the accompanying marketing materials.(2)If the contract purchaser is transacting the home protection contract in person, displayed on signs posted at every location where contracts are executed, including, but not limited to, the counter where the purchaser signs the home protection contract.(3)If the contract purchaser is transacting the home protection contract online, posted in a conspicuous location on the home protection contract vendor’s public-facing internet website.(4)If the contract purchaser is transacting the home protection contract over the phone, verbally to the contract purchaser on a recorded line.(d)If the home protection contract vendor or its employee is not licensed as a property and casualty insurance agent or home protection contract limited lines agent, the vendor is not qualified or authorized to do either of the following:(1)Answer claim-related technical questions about the benefits, exclusions, and conditions of any of the home protection contracts offered by the utility on behalf of the home protection company.(2)Evaluate the adequacy of the prospective consumer’s existing home protection contract or other insurance coverage.(e)A home protection company and a home protection contract limited lines agent shall not pay a home protection contract vendor an override commission for, or based on, the number of home protection contracts sold by the home protection contract vendor’s employees. (f)A home protection contract limited lines agent is permitted to pay a home protection contract vendor both of the following: (1)Marketing or administrative fees that are not contingent on the number of home protection contracts sold. (2)For billing or collection services under a utility line item billing program approved by the California Public Utilities Commission. (d) (1) A home protection contract vendor may receive compensation for billing and collection services based on the services rendered.(2) Compensation received by the home protection contract vendor shall comply with Section 12760.(e) If home protection contract fees are collected by the home protection contract vendor on behalf of a home protection contract limited lines agent or property and casualty insurance agent through the utility bill on a recurring basis, the home protection contract limited lines agent or property and casualty insurance agent shall provide each customer written or electronic notice not fewer than 15 calendar days and not more than 45 calendar days prior to every anniversary of the customer’s enrollment date. The notice shall clearly and conspicuously disclose, as applicable, all the following:(1) The anniversary date of the customer’s enrollment.(2) The date or dates on which the renewal period begins, and if the customer’s home protection contract renews, the length of the renewal period.(3) The home protection contract fee that will be charged to the customer on a recurring basis and the frequency of charges.(4) How the customer may cancel the home protection contract.(5) How the customer may request a copy of the home protection contract.(6) Contact information for the home protection contract limited lines agent or property and casualty insurance agent.12771. (a) In addition to the items listed in paragraph (a) of Section 12762, a home protection contract transacted pursuant to this chapter shall include all of the following: (1) (A) A prominent and readily noticeable statement explaining how to make a claim, including a toll-free telephone number, for claim service and cancellation requests. (B) Beginning on January 1, 2028, this statement shall also include a digital contact.(2) A disclosure, with the telephone number in boldface type in substantially the following form:“Performance to you under this contract is guaranteed by a California approved insurance company. You may file a claim with this insurance company if any obligation in the home protection contract has not been honored within 60 days after your request. The name and address of the insurance company is:(insert name, address, and contact information).If you are not satisfied with the insurance company’s response, you may contact the California Department of Insurance at 1-800-927-4357 or file a complaint online at the department’s internet website (www.insurance.ca.gov).” (3) A provision permitting the customer to return a home protection contract to the home protection company, the home protection contract limited lines agent, or the property and casualty insurance agent and void the home protection contract, within 30 days of purchase, if no claims have been made. The purchaser may return the home protection contract by contacting the home protection company, or home protection company limited lines agent, or property and casualty insurance agent to request that the home protection contract be voided. If returned within the 30-day window and no claims have been made, the home protection contract shall be deemed void and the full purchase price of the home protection contract shall be refunded to the customer. (4) A statement that a customer paying for the home protection contract through their utility bill may elect to pay for their home protection contract using another method of payment and an explanation of how the customer may change the payment method associated with their home protection contract, including a description of the payment methods available to the customer.12772. (a) The individual identified in the register maintained pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12768, who directs or controls the home protection contract vendor’s home protection contract-related operations, shall receive annual training provided by the home protection contract limited lines agent. The training material shall contain instruction on both of the following:(1) Home protection contract law, including the marketing disclosure requirements, and the rules related to home protection contract fee collection.(2) The types of home protection contracts being offered.(b) The training materials, and any material changes to the training, shall be submitted for approval to the department prior to use. The training materials, including any changes, shall be deemed approved for use unless the home protection contract limited lines agent is notified by the department to the contrary within 30 days of submission.(c) Failure to submit training materials or changes for departmental review, or use of unapproved or disapproved training materials, shall constitute grounds for denial of an application for a license, nonrenewal or suspension of a license, or other action as deemed appropriate by the commissioner.12770.12773. (a) If the commissioner determines that a home protection contract vendor, or its employee, vendor has violated any provision of this part or any other provision of this code, code incorporated into this part, the commissioner may do either of the following:(1) Direct the home protection limited lines agent or property and casualty insurance agent to do either of the following:(A) Implement a corrective action plan with the home protection contract vendor.(B) Revoke the authorization of the home protection contract vendor to transact solicit home protection contracts or collect home protection contract fees on its behalf and under its license and direct the home protection contract limited lines agent to remove the home protection contract vendor’s name from its register.(2) After notice and hearing, either of the following:(A) Suspend or revoke the license of the home protection contract limited lines agent.(B) Impose a monetary fine on Assess an administrative penalty against the home protection contract limited lines agent. agent, the property and casualty agent, the home protection company, or any combination thereof.(b) A home protection contract limited lines agent or property and casualty insurance agent who allows a home protection contract vendor to continue to do business after being directed to revoke the home protection contract vendor’s authorization or takes positive actions to assist the home protection contract vendor in doing so, in addition to any other action authorized under this section, may be subject to a monetary penalty pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12921.8.(c) The Notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 12768, the conduct of employees of the home protection contract vendor who transacts solicits home protection contracts in connection with, or on behalf of the home protection contract limited lines agent shall or property and casualty insurance agent, may, at the discretion of the commissioner, be imputed to the home protection contract limited lines agent or agent, property and casualty insurance agent, the home protection company company, or any combination thereof, for purposes of this part. 12771.12774. (a) In addition to the provisions listed in Section 12743, the following provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1 shall apply to a home protection limited lines agent:(1) Article 1 (commencing with Section 1621) to Article 4 (commencing with Section 1652), inclusive.(2) Article 6 (commencing with Section 1666) to Article 12 13 (commencing with Section 1724), 1737), inclusive.(3) Article 14 (commencing with Section 1750).(b) A property and casualty insurance agent shall not act as an agent of a home protection company to transact home protection contracts through, or in connection with, a utility pursuant to this chapter, unless a home protection company has filed with the commissioner a notice of appointment, executed by the home protection company, appointing the licensee property and casualty insurance agent as the home protection company’s agent. The authority to transact home protection contracts given to a licensee property and casualty insurance agent by a home protection company shall be effective as of the date the notice of appointment is signed. An appointment made under this subdivision shall by its terms continue in force until either of the following occur: (1) The cancellation or expiration of the license applied for or held at the time the appointment is filed. (2) A notice of termination is filed by the home protection contract company, in accordance with Section 1707. (c) The home protection contract limited lines agent shall be subject to the production agency records regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to Section 1727. (c)(d) If there is a conflict between the provisions made applicable by this section and this part, this part shall prevail. 12772.Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, a written announcement regarding the availability of a home protection contract through a specific home protection company, home protection contract limited lines agent, or a property and casualty insurance agent shall not constitute the transaction of home protection contracts if the written announcement only includes general information regarding the following:(a)The home protection contract being offered.(b)The attributes or character of the home protection company, the home protection contract limited lines agent, or the property and casualty insurance agent offering the home protection contract. 12773.(a)Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a utility may collect home protection fees on behalf of a property and casualty insurance agent or home protection company limited lines agent if the utility was collecting protection contract fees on behalf of the property and casualty insurance agent prior to January 1, 2025.(b)Notwithstanding Section 12775, this section shall become operative on January 1, 2027, and shall remain in effect until December 31, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.12774.12775. (a) A home protection company that issues or offers to issue transacts home protection contracts through utilities, prior to incurring an obligation under a home protection contract, shall file with the commissioner, and receive the commissioner’s approval to use, a copy of pursuant to this chapter shall maintain an insurance policy covering 100 percent of the home protection company’s contractual obligations in this state. associated with the home protection contracts. Except as provided in subdivision (h), the insurance policy shall be submitted to and approved by the commissioner prior to use. The insurance policy submitted to the commissioner for approval pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed approved 30 days after filing unless the home protection company is notified by the commissioner to the contrary. The policy shall be issued by an insurer admitted in this state and authorized by the commissioner to issue that insurance in this state. The insurance required by this subdivision shall be subject to both of the following:(1) The insurer shall, at the time the policy is filed with the commissioner, and continuously thereafter, have an AM Best Financial Strength Rating of B++ or better, maintain surplus as to policyholders and paid-in capital of at least fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), and annually file audited financial statements with the commissioner.(2) The policy shall provide that all purchasers of home protection contracts in this state transacted pursuant to this chapter shall be entitled to satisfaction by the insurer of all obligations arising under home protection contracts of the named home protection company, only upon the existence of both of the following conditions:(A) The home protection company is unable to, unable, refuses, or otherwise fails to satisfy an obligation arising under the home protection contract within 60 days of the date the purchaser submits proof of loss to the home protection company.(B) The purchaser provides written notice to the insurer that the home protection company has failed to comply with an obligation under the home protection contract.(b) A home protection company that issues or offers to issue transacts home protection contracts through utilities subject to subdivision (a) shall allow claims to be filed against the insurance described under this section.(c) An insurer’s liability under a policy filed submitted pursuant to this section shall not be negated or otherwise diminished by a failure of the utility, home protection contract vendor, home protection limited lines agent, property and casualty insurance agent, home protection company, or affiliates of these entities to report the issuance of a home protection contract or to remit moneys to another person pursuant to a contractual agreement. The policy shall state that payment of the premium home protection contract fee by the purchaser for a home protection contract insured by the policy is deemed payment to the insurer.(d) In the event an insurer cancels a policy that it has filed with has been submitted to the commissioner pursuant to this section, the home protection company named on the policy shall do either of the following:(1) File Submit a copy of a new policy with to the commissioner, before the termination of the prior policy, providing no lapse in coverage following the termination of the prior policy.(2) Take immediate action to discontinue the sale and marketing of home protection contracts by home protection contract vendors until a new insurance policy is filed and approved by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a).(2)Discontinue acting as a home protection company in this state as of the termination date of the policy until a(e) When home protection contract fees are being collected on behalf of the home protection company, and an insurer cancels the policy associated with that home protection company, unless a new policy becomes effective and has been accepted and acknowledged by the commissioner. commissioner, the home protection company shall do both of the following:(1) Make all reasonable efforts to secure a new payment method from affected customers.(2) Discontinue the collection of home protection contract fees through the home protection contract vendor’s utility bill within 180 days of the cancellation of the policy.(e)(f) This section shall not relieve a home protection company from any obligation incurred under home protection contracts issued with its name as the obligor prior to the date the policy was terminated.(f)(g) The commissioner may issue a cease and desist order pursuant to Section 1065.2 to a home protection company who that violates this section. The powers vested in the commissioner by this section are in addition to any and all other powers and remedies vested in the commissioner by law, and nothing herein shall be construed as requiring the commissioner to employ the powers conferred in this section instead of or as a condition precedent to the exercise of any other power or remedy vested in the commissioner.(g)(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a home protection company that issues or offers to issue home protection contracts through utilities may satisfy the requirements of this section through the use of an insurance policy that covers 100 percent of the home protection company’s contractual obligations in this state and is filed pursuant to another provision of this code. A copy of the insurance policy shall be provided to the department with the home protection company’s annual statement.12776. The commissioner may adopt, amend, or repeal regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter. 12775.Except as provided in Section 12773, this12777. This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2027.